Louisiana, session 2026, SB460.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
7 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Louisiana
8 Highway 526, also known as East Bert Kouns Industrial Drive, beginning at Wrenwood
9 Boulevard and ending on the western side of the Interstate 49 Interchange at Premier
10 Court, all of which is situated in Shreveport, Louisiana, in Caddo Parish, is hereby
11 designated as "Hayden Lane Mangum Memorial Highway".
12 Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
13 directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of this designation provided local or
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 460 ENROLLED
1 private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs
2 for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to exceed
3 the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.